Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,103
Partition in part; remaining portion; sale.

When partition can be conveniently made of part of the premises, but not of all, one portion may be partitioned and the other sold as hereinafter provided.

R.S.1867, Code § 836, p. 541;

R.S.1913, § 8319;

C.S.1922, § 9271;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,103;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,103.